Utah statutes.
58-49-7.   Certificates -- Display -- Surrender.

(1)  Any person who meets the certification qualifications of this chapter shall receive a certificate stating that he has met these qualifications.

(2)  Each certified dietitian shall:

(a)  display the certificate in an appropriate, conspicuous, and public manner; and

(b)  keep the division informed of his current address.

(3)  A certificate issued by the division is the property of the division and shall be surrendered on demand.

